Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5727XS (7) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2381 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 146F.1 Nonmedical pregnancy 1 resource centers. 2 1. For purposes of this chapter, ânonmedical pregnancy 3 resource centerâ means an entity described by all of the 4 following: 5 a. The entity is not licensed in this state to provide 6 medical services. 7 b. The entity provides individuals with counseling services 8 related to pregnancy and childbirth, including but not limited 9 to referrals to nonmedical services, child-rearing resources, 10 and adoption services. 11 c. The entity does not provide referrals for abortions. 12 2. A nonmedical pregnancy resource center shall do all of 13 the following: 14 a. Provide public disclosure in large, readable, boldface 15 type, that the nonmedical pregnancy resource center is not a 16 licensed health care provider. The public disclosure shall 17 include information regarding the hospital or clinic closest to 18 the location of the nonmedical pregnancy resource center that 19 provides pregnancy delivery services. The disclosure shall be 20 available as follows: 21 (1) Displayed in a prominent manner in a conspicuous 22 physical location that is clearly visible to the public from 23 the outside of each entrance to the nonmedical pregnancy 24 resource center. 25 (2) Included in all of the nonmedical pregnancy resource 26 centerâs advertising, marketing materials, and other media the 27 nonmedical pregnancy resource center releases to the public. 28 (3) Posted on the nonmedical pregnancy resource centerâs 29 internet site. The posted disclosure shall be readily 30 accessible to the public. 31 (4) Included in all office forms distributed by the 32 nonmedical pregnancy resource center. 33 b. Ensure that each ultrasound performed at the nonmedical 34 pregnancy resource center is performed by a health care 35 -1- LSB 5727XS (7) 91 ak/ko 1/ 4 S.F. 2381 provider licensed in this state and qualified to interpret 1 ultrasound results. 2 c. Maintain confidentiality, in compliance with state and 3 federal laws, of all data, files, and records related to the 4 services provided to individuals. A nonmedical pregnancy 5 resource center shall comply with the federal Health Insurance 6 Portability and Accountability Act or HIPAA as defined in 7 section 135D.2, regardless of whether the nonmedical pregnancy 8 resource center is a covered entity as defined under HIPAA or 9 is otherwise subject to HIPAA. 10 3. The department of health and human services shall 11 establish a complaint process for the submission of reports of 12 alleged violations of this chapter, including but not limited 13 to alleged violations of administrative rules. 14 4. A governmental entity, including the department of 15 health and human services, shall not renew, extend, or enter 16 into a contract with any nonmedical pregnancy resource center. 17 5. The department of health and human services shall adopt 18 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement and administer this 19 chapter. 20 Sec. 2. REPEAL. Section 217.41C, Code 2026, is repealed. 21 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ MORE 22 OPTIONS FOR MATERNAL SUPPORT PROGRAM ââ TERMINATION. 23 1. For purposes of this section: 24 a. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human 25 services. 26 b. âMOMS programâ means the more options for maternal 27 support program created in section 217.41C. 28 2. The department is directed to terminate the MOMS program 29 on or before August 31, 2026. 30 3. All funds appropriated to the department for the MOMS 31 program that remain unobligated and unencumbered on the 32 date the MOMS program terminates shall be transferred to the 33 department to increase reimbursement rates for labor and 34 delivery services provided under the medical assistance program 35 -2- LSB 5727XS (7) 91 ak/ko 2/ 4 S.F. 2381 pursuant to chapter 249A. 1 Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ MEDICAL 2 ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ââ LABOR AND DELIVERY REIMBURSEMENT RATE 3 INCREASE. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 4 state to the department of health and human services for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 To increase the reimbursement rates for labor and delivery 9 services provided under the medical assistance program pursuant 10 to chapter 249A: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 12 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 13 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 14